Utah statutes.
10-3-1004.   Qualifications of commissioners -- Salary -- Removal.
Not more than two members of the civil service commission shall at any one
time be of the same political party. No member of the civil service commission
shall during his tenure of office hold any other public office, or be a
candidate for any other public office. Each member shall receive $25 for each
meeting of the commission which he shall attend, but shall not receive more
than $100 in any one month. In case of misconduct, inability or willful
neglect in the performance of the duties of the office by any member, the
member may be removed from office by the board of city commissioners by a
majority vote of the entire membership, but the member shall, if he so
desires, have opportunity to be heard in defense.
